Maryland, session 2025, SB0799.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 32–1001 through 32–1001.3 of Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0799*

SENATE BILL 799
of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 32–1001.1 through
32–1001.4, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
32–102.
This title applies only in Wicomico County.
32–1001.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FACILITY” MEANS:
(1) AN ATHLETIC FACILITY;
(2) AN AUDITORIUM;
(3) A BANQUET HALL; OR
(4) A CONFERENCE CENTER.
(B) THERE IS A CLASS B (ATHLETIC AND EVENT FACILITY) BEER, WINE, AND
LIQUOR LICENSE.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD MAY ISSUE
THE LICENSE FOR USE AT A FACILITY THAT HAS:
(1) A KITCHEN FOR THE PREPARATION AND MANAGEMENT OF FOOD
FOR SERVICE IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE SALE OF ALCOHOL; AND
(2) A CAPACITY OF AT LEAST 500 PEOPLE.
(D) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR, FROM ONE OR MORE OUTLETS LOCATED WITHIN THE FACILITY, FOR
ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(E) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS:
(1) PROHIBITING THE CONSUMPTION OF ALCOHOL BY SPECTATORS
AND OTHER PARTICIPANTS IN YOUTH EVENTS, INCLUDING YOUTH ATHLETIC
EVENTS; AND

SENATE BILL 799 3
(2) ESTABLISHING REQUIREMENTS FOR:
(I) THE DISPENSING OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES;
(II) THE NUMBER OF OUTLETS AUTHORIZED TO DISPENSE
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES WITHIN A FACILITY;
(III) THE MINIMUM CAPITAL INVESTMENT IN THE LICENSED
PREMISES;
(IV) THE HOURS AND DAYS OF SALE; AND
(V) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Board of License
Commissioners for Wicomico County may not issue a Class B (athletic and event facility)
beer, wine, and liquor license under § 32–1001 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this Act, until the regulations the Board adopts under §
32–1001(e) of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this
Act, take effect.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.